Oklahoma, session 2026, SB608.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


Wrecker and Towing Advisory Board Act of 2025”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 971 of Title 47, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. There is hereby created within the Department of Public


Safety, the Oklahoma Wrecker and Towing Advisory Board, to be


composed of five members appointed by the Department of Public

Req. No. 267 Page 1


Safety and two members appointed by the Corporation Commission. No


person shall be appointed as a member of the Board unless, at the


time of his or her appointment, he or she is a legal resident of


this state. A member shall automatically be disqualified to hold


his or her position on the Board in the event he or she ceases to be


a legal resident of this state.


2. The five members appointed by the Department of Public


Safety shall be appointed from the wrecker or towing industry and


shall be licensed to engage in nonconsensual towing. Of the two


members appointed by the Corporation Commission, one member shall be


engaged in vehicle repossession and one member shall be appointed


from the insurance industry. A member shall automatically be


disqualified to hold his or her position on the Board in the event


he or she ceases to meet the industry requirements for his or her


Board position.


B. Members shall serve until their successors in office are


duly appointed and qualified. Initial appointments of the members


shall be for terms ranging from one (1) to four (4) years, with the


Department of Public Safety and Corporation Commission designating


which member shall serve for which term. Thereafter, the terms of


all members shall be for three (3) years. In the event of the


death, resignation, disqualification, or incapacity of one or more


members of the Board, an appointment for the unexpired term of each



Req. No. 267 Page 2


such member may be made by the appointing authority as provided in


this section.


C. The Board shall organize by electing one of its members as


chair and one member as vice chair. Subsequent elections for chair


and vice chair shall take place annually on a date designated by a


majority vote the Board.


D. The Board shall hold regular meetings. The date, time, and


place of any regular meeting shall be designated by the chair and


subject to the approval of a majority of the membership. Four


members of the Board shall constitute a quorum for all purposes.


The chair or vice chair may, upon approval of a majority of the


members present and voting at any meeting, designate the time,


place, and date of any scheduled special meeting, and the chair or


vice chair shall have the power to call an unscheduled special


meeting of the Board upon not less than five (5) days’ notice in


writing to each member.


E. The Oklahoma Wrecker and Towing Advisory Board shall:


1. Serve in an advisory capacity to the Department of Public


Safety and the Corporation Commission;


2. Assist in the development of rules, standards, policies,


procedures, and directions of the Department of Public Safety and


the Corporation Commission with regards to the wrecker and towing


industry; and



Req. No. 267 Page 3


3. Recommend specific policies and actions to the Department of


Public Safety and the Corporation Commission that would increase the


efficiency and safety of the wrecker and towing industry in this


state.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-267 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:39:56 AM



































Req. No. 267 Page 4